Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.475

Licensee under chapter—Prima facie evidence acting as licensee handling agricultural products.

It shall be prima facie evidence that a licensee licensed under the provisions of this chapter is acting as such in the handling of any agricultural product.

[ 2011 c 103 s 40; 1971 ex.s. c 182 s 13; 1967 c 240 s 43.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2011 c 103: See note following RCW 15.26.120.